Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.18
Division of communications; form advisory boards; expenses.

The division of communications may form temporary advisory boards to provide advice in the development, management, administration, and operation of a consolidated communications system to meet the communications requirements of all departments and agencies of state government. Board members shall be selected by the division and shall receive no compensation for duties performed as members of a board, but shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred while engaged in the performance of their duties under the provisions of sections 23-1715, 81-1108.02, 81-1120.01 to 81-1120.03, 81-1120.15 to 81-1120.28, and 81-1423 as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 5, p. 1882;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1120.05;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 9;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 190;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 32;

Laws 1984, LB 1125, § 6;

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 23.